dargwa.twol
Alphabet
  а б в г д е ё ж з и й к л м н о п р с т у ф х ц ч ш ъ ь э ю я I

  %{а%}:е %{а%}:а
  %{у%}:0 %{у%}:у
  %{и%}:0 %{и%}:и
  %{л%}:н %{л%}:л
  %{р%}:р %{л%}:л
  
;

Rules

"{л} realisation"
%{л%}:н <=> н _ ;

"{и} realisation"
%{и%}:0 <=> _ е;

"{у} realisation"
%{у%}:0 <=> _ е;
